Hawaii, session 2026, HB2158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the university of Hawaii system is experiencing sustained enrollment declines, demographic shifts, workforce shortages, and increasing fiscal pressures and this is a matter of statewide concern pursuant to article X, section 6, of the Hawaii State Constitution, that requires careful stewardship of public higher education resources. The legislature further finds that informed institutional planning and rightsizing require transparent, consistent, and comparable data on academic programs, including student demand, completion, cost, and post-graduation outcomes. While the university of Hawaii conducts internal program reviews, the availability and consistency of program-level data across campuses varies and is not readily accessible to students, policymakers, or the public. The legislature also finds that students and their families increasingly require clear, accessible, and comparable information to make informed decisions regarding educational pathways, including the total cost of attendance, time to completion, and expected post-graduation outcomes. The purpose of this Act is to improve transparency and data availability primarily to support students and their families in  making informed decisions regarding educational pathways and outcomes, while also supporting evidence-based institutional planning, program review, and rightsizing of the university of Hawaii system, and respecting the constitutional authority of the board of regents over internal structure, management, and operation of the university. SECTION 2.  Chapter 304A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I, subpart A, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§304A-     Program level transparency; dashboard; reports.  (a) The university of Hawaii shall develop a systemwide data inventory and implementation plan for a publicly accessible online dashboard intended primarily to provide students and their families with clear, comparable, and actionable information regarding academic programs, including cost, time to completion, and post-completion outcomes. (b)  No later than December 1, 2026, the university of Hawaii shall submit to the legislature a preliminary report that includes: (1)  A comprehensive inventory of existing data elements available across all campuses; (2)  Identification of gaps in data collection and data infrastructure; (3)  Standardized definitions for key data elements; (4)  A phased implementation roadmap for the development of the dashboard, including timelines, methodologies, and priorities; and (5)  A proposed list of data elements to be included in the dashboard. (c)  Based on the implementation roadmap developed pursuant to subsection (b), the university of Hawaii shall develop, implement, and maintain a publicly accessible, systemwide online dashboard.  The dashboard shall be designed with students and their families as the primary audience and shall prioritize clarity, usability, and relevance to decision-making. (d)  The dashboard shall include data elements as determined by the university of Hawaii pursuant to subsection (b)(5), which may include: (1)  Total cost of attendance over time; (2)  Median time to degree or completion; (3)  Student retention and completion rates; (4)  Post-completion outcomes, including employment status, median earnings, and enrollment in further education; and (5)  Any other information deemed relevant to student decision-making. (e)  The university of Hawaii may include additional program-level data elements to support institutional planning and policymaking purposes, including but not limited to cost, capacity, and instructional metrics; provided that the inclusion of such information does not detract from the primary student-facing purpose of the dashboard. (f)  All data reported pursuant to this section shall be presented in a manner that protects student privacy and complies with applicable state and federal laws. (g)  No later than December 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the university of Hawaii shall submit a report to the legislature that includes: (1)  Progress on the implementation and operation of the dashboard; (2)  Any updates to data definitions or methodologies; (3)  Systemwide trends in enrollment, completion, and post-completion outcomes; and (4)  How data is being used to inform institutional planning and decision-making, including but not limited to decisions to continue, redesign, consolidate, suspend, or terminate academic programs. (h)  The university of Hawaii shall submit a supplementary report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the Regular Session of 2031.  The supplementary report shall include findings assessing the relevance, effectiveness, and alignment of the dashboard with its intended purpose, as well as any proposed legislation. (i)  The university of Hawaii shall incorporate the data developed pursuant to this section into the board of regents' existing academic program review, planning, and prioritization processes." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval; provided that this Act shall be repealed on June 30, 2031.